Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-526
Audiology or speech-language pathology assistant; evaluation, supervision, training; supervisor; report required.

The supervising audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall provide annual reports to the department verifying that evaluation, supervision, and training required by section 38-525 has been completed. The audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall keep accurate records of such evaluation, supervision, and training.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 31;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 77;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.09;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 37;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 69;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 211.